New Jersey, session 222, S3558.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Made in New Jersey Tax Credit Act. 2.    a.  A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) in an amount equal to 25 percent multiplied by the ratio between (1) the costs incurred in the purchase of New Jersey made products for the purposes of retail sales, manufacturing, or a manufacturing production process and (2) the taxpayers costs incurred in the purchase of any products for the purposes of retails sales, manufacturing, or a manufacturing production process.  Total costs incurred shall exclude any costs for products that the taxpayer demonstrates could not have been substituted with a similar made in New Jersey product. A taxpayer shall not be eligible for this credit if two thirds or more of total costs incurred are excluded because the taxpayer demonstrates that they could not have been substituted with a similar made in New Jersey product. An unused credit may be carried forward, if necessary, for use in the seven privilege periods following the privilege period for which the credit is allowed. The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed by law shall be prescribed by the director.  The amount of the credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period, together with any other credits allowed by law, shall not exceed the amount otherwise due and shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (54:10A-5). b.    As used in this section: Director means the Director of the Division of Taxation. New Jersey made product means a product for which all or virtually all significant parts, processing, and labor that produce the product originate or are sourced from New Jersey. New Jersey made products shall not include any product that contains anything more than negligible out of state content. 3.    Notwithstanding any provision of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury is authorized to adopt immediately upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law such rules and regulations necessary to implement this act, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations specifying annual application, documentation, verification, and award requirements related to the purchase of New Jersey made products.   The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be effective for a period not to exceed 360 days following the date of filing and may thereafter be amended, adopted, or readopted by the director in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to privilege periods beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.